Idaho, session 2025, H0460.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Division of Vocational Rehabilitation
for the Council for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing Program $35,000 from the
General Fund to be expended for operating expenditures for the period July
1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 2. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chap-
ter 181, Laws of 2024, and any other appropriation provided by law, there is
hereby appropriated to the Division of Vocational Rehabilitation for the Vo-
cational Rehabilitation Program $4,400,000 from the General Fund to be ex-
pended for trustee and benefit payments for the period July 1, 2024, through
June 30, 2025.
SECTION 3. USE OF APPROPRIATED FUNDS. Of the moneys appropriated from
the Federal Grant Fund to the Division of Vocational Rehabilitation for the
period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026, no more than seventeen percent
may be utilized for pre-employment transition services.
SECTION 4. SERVICE PRIORITIZATION. If the number of individuals eligi-
ble for services provided by the Division of Vocational Rehabilitation ex-
ceeds available funding in a fiscal year, funding shall be prioritized for
those with the most significant disabilities.
SECTION 5. SERVICE PROVIDER REPORT. The Division of Vocational Reha-
bilitation shall provide two reports identifying contracts with community
rehabilitation providers to the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee and
the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative Services Office
by December 15, 2025, and by June 15, 2026. The reports shall include regions
served by each provider and the date on which the division entered into a ser-
vice agreement with each provider.


SECTION 6. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 7. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Section 2 of this act shall be in full force and effect
on and after passage and approval, and Sections 1 and 3 through 6 of this act
shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2025.